test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vakt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vakț: # Noun 66 'eng /est valvur/fin' - full paradigm
     vakț+N+Sg+Nom: vakț
     vakț+N+Sg+Gen: vakț
     vakț+N+Sg+Par: vakțõ
     vakț+N+Sg+Dat: vakțõn
     vakț+N+Sg+Ins: vakțõks
     vakț+N+Sg+Ill: vakțõ
     vakț+N+Sg+Ela: vakțštõ
     vakț+N+Pl+Nom: vakțīd
     vakț+N+Pl+Gen: vakțīd
     vakț+N+Pl+Par: vakțīdi
     vakț+N+Pl+Dat: vakțīdõn
     vakț+N+Pl+Ins: vakțīdõks
     vakț+N+Pl+Ill: vakțīž
     vakț+N+Pl+Ela: vakțīst
